Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.205

Retired active license status.

The commission may adopt rules pursuant to this section authorizing a retired active license status. An individual licensed pursuant to this chapter, who is practicing only in emergent or intermittent circumstances as defined by rule established by the commission, may hold a retired active license at a reduced renewal fee established by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. Such a license shall meet the continuing education requirements, if any, established by the commission for renewals, and is subject to the provisions of the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW. Individuals who have entered into retired status agreements with the disciplinary authority in any jurisdiction shall not qualify for a retired active license under this section.

[ 2013 c 19 s 16; 1996 c 191 s 48; 1991 c 229 s 2.]